Maryland, session 2026, HB0093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
4.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) (1) “Home builder” means a person that undertakes to erect or otherwise
construct a new home.
(2) “Home builder” includes:
(i) a custom home builder as defined in § 10–501 of the Real
Property Article;
(ii) a new home builder subject to § 10–301 of the Real Property
Article;
(iii) the installer or retailer of a mobile home or an industrialized
building intended for residential use; and
(iv) a person that enters into a contract with a consumer under which
the person agrees to provide the consumer with a new home.
(3) “Home builder” does not include:
(i) an employee of a registrant who does not hold himself or herself
out for hire in home building except as an employee of a registrant;
(ii) subcontractors or other vendors hired by the registrant to
perform services or supply materials for the construction of a new home who do not
otherwise meet the requirements of this title;
(iii) the manufacturer of industrialized buildings intended for
residential use or of mobile homes, unless the manufacturer also installs the industrialized
buildings or mobile homes;
(iv) a real estate developer who does not construct, or enter into
contracts with consumers to provide or construct, homes;
(v) a financial institution that lends funds for the construction or
purchase of residential dwellings in the State;

HOUSE BILL 93 3
(vi) except as otherwise provided in this title, a person who erects or
constructs new homes solely in Montgomery County; or
(vii) a buyer’s agent, as defined in § 17–530 of the Business
Occupations and Professions Article, when representing a prospective buyer in the
purchase of a new home.
(m) (1) “New home” means each newly constructed residential dwelling unit in
the State and the fixtures and structure that are made a part of a newly constructed private
dwelling unit at the time of construction.
(2) “New home” includes:
(i) a custom home as defined in § 10–501(c) of the Real Property
Article;
(ii) a new home to which § 10–301 of the Real Property Article
applies;
(iii) an industrialized building intended for residential use; and
(iv) a mobile home.
4.5–502.
(a) Subject to the notice and hearing provisions of Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State
Government Article, the Division may bring a civil administrative action against a person
that violates § 4.5–501(a) of this subtitle OR ANY PROVISION OF SUBTITLE 8 OF THIS
TITLE.
(b) After a hearing, if the Division finds that a person has:
(1) violated § 4.5–501(a) of this subtitle, the Division may:
[(1)] (I) order the person to cease and desist from unlawful practice; and
[(2)] (II) impose a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each day of
unlawful practice; OR
(2) VIOLATED ANY PROVISION OF SUBTITLE 8 OF THIS TITLE, THE
DIVISION MAY:
(I) ORDER THE PERSON TO CEASE AND DESIST FROM
UNLAWFUL PRACTICE; AND

HOUSE BILL 93
(II) 1. FOR A FIRST OFFENSE OR FOR A SECOND OFFENSE IF
THE HOME BUILDER REMAINS IN VIOLATION FOR LESS THAN 3 DAYS, IMPOSE A FINE
UP TO $5,000 PER DAY THAT THE VIOLATION CONTINUES;
2. FOR A SECOND OFFENSE, IF THE HOME BUILDER
REMAINS IN VIOLATION FOR 3 DAYS OR MORE, IMPOSE A FINE UP TO $10,000 PER
DAY THAT THE VIOLATION CONTINUES; AND
3. FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, SUSPEND
THE REGISTRATION OF THE HOME BUILDER FOR UP TO 30 DAYS.
(c) Any party aggrieved by a decision and order of the Division under this section
may file an appeal as provided under §§ 10–222 and 10–223 of the State Government
Article.
SUBTITLE 8. MODEL HOMES AND CONTRACTS FOR THE INTENT TO PURCHASE A
NEW HOME.
4.5–801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BASE MODEL HOME” MEANS A MODEL HOME THAT INCLUDES ONLY
BUILDER GRADE ITEMS WITH NO UPGRADES.
(C) “BUILDER GRADE” MEANS ANY STANDARD, BASIC QUALITY FEATURE,
MATERIAL, OR APPLIANCE THAT IS INCLUDED IN THE PURCHASE PRICE OF A BASE
MODEL NEW HOME WITH NO UPGRADES.
(D) “CONSULTATION SERVICES” MEANS PROFESSIONAL ADVISORY
SERVICES PROVIDED BY A HOME BUILDER TO A POTENTIAL HOME BUYER
REGARDING THE DESIGN AND PURCHASE OF A NEW HOME BEFORE THE PURCHASE
OF A NEW HOME, INCLUDING REVIEWING PRICING INFORMATION AND BUILDING
OPTIONS AND ANSWERING RELATED INQUIRIES.
(E) “MODEL HOME” MEANS A REPRESENTATIVE HOME CONSTRUCTED AND
FURNISHED TO DEMONSTRATE THE FEATURES, DESIGNS, AND LAYOUTS AVAILABLE
FOR PURCHASE IN A NEW HOME FROM A HOME BUILDER.
(F) “UPGRADE” MEANS ANY FEATURE, MATERIAL, APPLIANCE,
IMPROVEMENT, OR OTHER EXTRA THAT HAS A STANDARD OF QUALITY ABOVE A
BUILDER GRADE OFFERING.

HOUSE BILL 93 5
4.5–802.
(A) (1) FOR EACH MODEL HOME CONSTRUCTED BY A HOME BUILDER, THE
HOME BUILDER SHALL PROVIDE TO EACH PROSPECTIVE HOME BUYER A DOCUMENT
THAT INCLUDES:
(I) A COMPLETE LIST OF ALL UPGRADES IN THE MODEL HOME
AND THE ESTIMATED COST OF EACH UPGRADE;
(II) FOR EACH BUILDER GRADE ITEM NOT USED IN THE MODEL
HOME, THE CREDIT VALUE FOR THE BUILDER GRADE ITEM TOWARD AN UPGRADED
ITEM;
(III) THE TOTAL PRICE AND SQUARE FOOTAGE OF THE BASE
MODEL HOME; AND
(IV) THE TOTAL PRICE AND SQUARE FOOTAGE OF THE MODEL
HOME INCLUSIVE OF ALL UPGRADES IN THE MODEL HOME.
(2) AT THE REQUEST OF A POTENTIAL HOME BUYER, THE HOME
BUILDER SHALL MAKE A COPY OF THE DOCUMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AVAILABLE IN BOTH PAPER AND ELECTRONIC FORMATS.
(B) (1) THE HOME BUILDER OF A MODEL HOME SHALL POST A SIGN
WITHIN 10 FEET OF THE MAIN ENTRANCE OF THE MODEL HOME THAT IS CLEARLY
VISIBLE TO A POTENTIAL HOME BUYER THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION:
(I) A LIST OF ALL UPGRADES INCLUDED IN THE MODEL HOME;
(II) THE COST OF EACH INDIVIDUAL UPGRADE IN THE MODEL
HOME, INCLUDING MATERIALS, LABOR, AND BUILDER MARKUP CLEARLY LISTED;
(III) THE TOTAL PRICE AND SQUARE FOOTAGE OF THE BASE
MODEL HOME WITH NO UPGRADES; AND
(IV) THE TOTAL PRICE AND SQUARE FOOTAGE OF THE MODEL
HOME INCLUSIVE OF ALL UPGRADES.
(2) A SIGN POSTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL:
(I) USE A CLEAR, SIMPLE FONT;

HOUSE BILL 93
(II) HAVE LETTERS A MINIMUM OF ONE–HALF INCH IN HEIGHT;
AND
(III) BE UNOBSTRUCTED FROM VIEW.
4.5–803.
(A) AT THE TIME OF SIGNING A CONTRACT FOR THE INTENT TO PURCHASE
A NEW HOME, THE HOME BUILDER SHALL PROVIDE THE HOME BUYER WITH A
COMPLETE LIST OF ALL AVAILABLE UPGRADES AND THE COST OF EACH UPGRADE.
(B) A HOME BUILDER MAY CHARGE A FEE OF UP TO $250 FOR
CONSULTATION SERVICES TO A PROSPECTIVE HOME BUYER.
(C) (1) A HOME BUYER HAS THE RIGHT TO RESCIND A CONTRACT FOR
THE INTENT TO PURCHASE A NEW HOME WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE DATE
OF SIGNING THE CONTRACT FOR ANY REASON.
(2) EXCEPT FOR A CONSULTATION FEE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION, IF THE HOME BUYER RESCINDS A CONTRACT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE HOME BUILDER SHALL FULLY REFUND ALL MONEY PAID
TO THE HOME BUILDER, INCLUDING:
(I) ANY DEPOSIT FOR A HOMESITE, LOT, OR OTHER PARCEL OF
LAND;
(II) A DEPOSIT FOR THE NEW HOME; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ADVANCE MONEY PAID AS PART OF THE NEW
HOME PURCHASING PROCESS.
Subtitle [8.] 9. Short Title.
[4.5–801.] 4.5–901.
This title may be cited as the Maryland Home Builder Registration Act.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.